Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-1307.01
Director of Personnel; salary
survey; duties.

The Director of Personnel shall measure,
through the use of salary surveys, the competitive standing of state salaries
with salary levels of the labor market. The State Personnel Board shall review
the methodology and results of the survey. A report of the survey findings,
including the board's review, shall be provided to the Legislature and the
Governor along with the recommendations regarding wages, hours, and terms
and conditions of employment for unorganized employees by the Chief Negotiator
pursuant to section 81-1376. The
report submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted electronically.

Laws 1987, LB 661, § 33;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 197.
July 19, 2012